Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-602
Over-insurance; procurement unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any party having an insurable interest in property located in this state to knowingly procure any fire insurance policy upon his interest in such property, for an amount in excess of the fair value of his interest in the property, or for an amount which, with any existing insurance thereon, exceeds the fair value of his interest in the property.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 110, p. 454;

R.S.1913, § 3247;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. VIII, § 2, p. 635;

C.S.1922, § 7846;

C.S.1929, § 44-702;

R.S.1943, § 44-602.

Where fire insurance policies issued by different insurers contain prohibitions against other insurance and prorating clauses, but no escape clauses, any loss is to be prorated. Kent v. Insurance Co. of North America, 189 Neb. 769, 205 N.W.2d 532 (1973).